Wyoming statutes. Title 15 Cities and Towns
Article 4. Annexation; Determination of Boundaries; Addition and Exclusionof Land
§ 15-1-410.
Annexing territories; extension of laws and rights; extension of public utility service.

The territory and inhabitants of any annexed area are subject to all the laws, ordinances, rules and regulations of the city or town to which they are annexed and are entitled to all the rights, privileges and franchises or other services afforded the inhabitants thereof. The services shall be provided in accordance with the timetable provided pursuant to W.S. 15-1-402(c)(iii). Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no law, ordinance, rule or regulation of a municipality annexing property under W.S.

15-1-404

shall restrict the continuous use of the property by a current or subsequent owner of an interest in the property, if the use was existing at any time within the year prior to the date of annexation and was lawful at the time the property was annexed. For purposes of this subsection, a use which has been discontinued for any one (1) year period after the date of annexation shall not be considered continuous and shall not thereafter be reestablished unless in conformance with current law, ordinance, rule or regulation.

The governing body of the annexing municipality shall, within thirty (30) days after the date of the annexation, give written notice of the annexation to all public electric utilities presently providing service within the annexed area and, except in the case of an annexing municipality which owns or operates its own electric utility, any area adjacent to the annexed area. Except in the case of an annexing municipality which owns or operates its own electric utility, any of those public utilities required to be notified may, within sixty (60) days after the date of annexation, petition the governing body of the annexing city or town for a franchise to serve additional portions within the annexed area or the entire annexed area. Except in the case of a municipality which owns or operates its own electric utility, any petitioning utility which does not currently hold a certificate of public convenience and necessity for the annexed area shall petition the public service commission for a certificate to include the annexed area, and if two (2) or more public electric utilities have been granted or are seeking a certificate of public convenience and necessity to serve the annexed area, the public service commission shall determine, following a hearing, which utility or utilities should be certificated in the public interest to provide service to the annexed area. No recipient of a certificate of public convenience and necessity shall serve any portion of the annexed area without the consent of the governing body of the annexing city or town and provided that the entire annexed area is served under one (1) or more certificates of public convenience and necessity.

Except in the case of an annexing municipality which owns or operates its own electric utility, the governing body of the annexing municipality shall hold an appropriate public hearing and, upon determining that one (1) or more petitioning public utilities can meet the terms and conditions of a franchise, issue franchises to one (1) or more utilities to serve portions of or the entire annexed area.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, nothing contained in this section shall limit the right of a municipality which owns or operates its own electric utility to extend its electric service into any area annexed by the municipality, and nothing contained in this section shall subject any such municipality to the jurisdiction of the public service commission.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 63; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-63; W.S. 1977, §

15-1-510

; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 1989, ch. 198, § 1; 1997, ch. 158, § 2.

Interest in annexation found. —

Adjoining landowners had standing to bring a declaratory judgment action regarding a municipal ordinance annexing certain property because, among other things, the annexation brought their land within the city's control and, should annexation occur, additional restrictions such as continual use to maintain the “grandfather” status created an interest in the annexation. Cox v. City of Cheyenne, 2003 WY 146, 79 P.3d 500,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 177

(Wyo. 2003).

Extension of utility into annexed territory without franchise.—

When new territory is brought into a city, its ordinances and any pertinent state statutes immediately go into effect in the new area it has annexed, but until such time as a private utility receives a franchise from the city, it is not entitled to extend its service to other than those of its customers or members served at the time of annexation. Tri-County Elec. Ass'n v. Gillette, 584 P.2d 995,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 227

(Wyo. 1978).

Cited

in

Tri-County Elec. Ass'n v. City of Gillette, 525 P.2d 3,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 226

(Wyo. 1974); Town of Wheatland v. Allison, 577 P.2d 1006,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 288

(Wyo. 1978).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity of municipal bond issue as against owners of property annexation of which to municipality became effective after date of election at which issue was approved by voters, 10 ALR2d 559.

What zoning regulations are applicable to territory annexed to a municipality, 41 ALR2d 1463.

§ 15-1-411.
Incorporation of territory within potential urban area.

All territory within one (1) mile of an incorporated city or town, as it now exists or may hereafter be established, is potentially an urban area. No territory within a potential urban area may be incorporated as a city or town unless the governing body of the city or town causing the potential urbanized area to exist, by resolution, approves the proposed incorporation.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 64; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-64; W.S. 1977, §

15-1-511

; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

Interest where annexation brings property within city's control.—

Adjoining landowners had standing to bring a declaratory judgment action regarding a municipal ordinance annexing certain property because, among other things, the annexation brought their land within the city's control under this section. Cox v. City of Cheyenne, 2003 WY 146, 79 P.3d 500,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 177

(Wyo. 2003).

Authority to disapprove proposed subdivision within one mileof city limits. —

City had authority to approve or disapprove a proposed subdivision because it was within one mile of the city's limits pursuant to Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

34-12-103

and Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

15-1-411

; also, property owners did not point to any law establishing that the city had a ministerial duty that was plainly defined and required by law such that mandamus relief was warranted.
Gose v. City of Douglas, 2008 WY 126, 193 P.3d 1159,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 129

(Wyo. 2008), overruled in part, Brown v. City of Casper, 2011 WY 35, 248 P.3d 1136,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 36

(Wyo. 2011).

Quoted

in

In re West Laramie, 457 P.2d 498,

1969 Wyo. LEXIS 149

(Wyo. 1969); Town of Marbleton v. Town of Big Piney, 719 P.2d 1389,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 564

(Wyo. 1986).

§ 15-1-412.
When written consent of landowners required for annexation; exception.

No tract of land or any part thereof, whether consisting of one (1) parcel or two (2) or more contiguous parcels owned by one (1) landowner or owned jointly by two (2) or more landowners as cotenants, which comprises forty (40) acres or more and which together with the buildings or improvements situated thereon has an assessed valuation in excess of forty thousand dollars ($40,000.00) as of the current assessment for property tax purposes, may be annexed without the written consent of the landowner or landowners, unless the tract of land is situated entirely within the boundaries of the annexing city or town.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 65; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-65; W.S. 1977, §

15-1-512

; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

§ 15-1-413.
Survey of boundaries; when and how to be made; presumption once recorded.

If the boundaries of any city or town are uncertain or incapable of ascertainment and upon the change in boundaries of any city or town pursuant to any annexation under this chapter, the governing body, by ordinance, shall provide for a survey thereof. When the survey is made, the boundaries shall be marked by substantial monuments, and the person making the survey shall report to the governing body describing the boundaries by metes and bounds. The description as nearly as possible shall refer, if upon surveyed lands, to the corners or lines of the United States surveys. The person making the survey shall also file with the city or town clerk the field notes of his survey. The city or town clerk shall then file a copy of the report and a copy of the field notes certified by the mayor and clerk with the county clerk for the county in which the city or town is located.

Any survey made and recorded as provided in subsection (a) of this section is presumptive of the boundaries of the city or town, and any copy thereof certified by the county clerk shall be received in evidence in any court of this state.

The city or town clerk shall file a copy of an official map or legal description designating the geographical boundaries of the city or town or the changes to its geographical boundaries with the department of revenue, the county assessor and the county clerk in the county or counties within which the city or town is located in accordance with the department’s rules adopted pursuant to W.S. 39-11-102(c)(xxiv) regarding tax districts, with any special district affected by the boundary change and as follows:

Within ten (10) days after the effective date of formation; and

Within thirty (30) days if a city or town has changes to its geographical boundaries by annexation or de-annexation.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, §§ 66, 68; W.S. 1957, §§ 15.1-66, 15.1-68; W.S. 1977, §§ 15-1-513, 15-1-515; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 1997, ch. 158, § 2; 2005, ch. 108, § 2; 2007, ch. 28, § 1; 2010, ch. 69, § 207.

The 2005 amendment,

added (c).

Laws 2005, ch. 108, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 24, 2005.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, in (a) in the first sentence, inserted “and upon the change in boundaries of any city or town pursuant to any annexation under this chapter,”, substituted “shall” for “may”, and deleted “or perambulation, in the second sentence, substituted “When” for “If” and deleted “or perambulation”; in (c) inserted “, with any special district affected by the boundary change” preceding “and as follows:”; in (c)(ii) substituted “Within thirty (30) days” for “Annually, by a date determined by the department”; and deleted “in the preceding year” at the end.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, in (b), substituted “Any survey made” for “Any survey or perambulation made.”

§ 15-1-414.
Survey of boundaries; oath required; filing thereof.

Any person making the survey who is not an officer of the city or town, before entering upon the work, shall subscribe an oath to:

Faithfully, diligently and to the best of his ability make the survey;

Make field notes and report accurately the results of the survey and the description of the boundaries.

The oath shall be filed with the city or town clerk and a copy thereof shall be attached to the certificate filed with the county clerk.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 67; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-67; W.S. 1977, § 15-1-514; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 1997, ch. 158, § 2; 2007, ch. 28, § 1.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, in (a) and (a)(i) deleted “or perambulation” following “the survey” and made a stylistic change.

§ 15-1-415.
Additions to cities or towns by subdividing landowners; plat requirements; filing and effect thereof; controlling layout of streets.

The owner of any land within or contiguous to any city or town may subdivide the land into lots, blocks, streets, avenues and alleys and other grounds under the name of . . . . . addition to the city (town) of . . . . . An accurate map or plat shall be made designating the subdivided land and particularly describing the lots, blocks, streets, avenues and alleys and other grounds of the addition. The lots must be designated by numbers, and the streets, avenues and other grounds by name or numbers.

The plat shall:

Be acknowledged before some officer authorized to acknowledge deeds;

Have appended a survey made by a land surveyor registered under the laws of this state with a certificate that he has accurately surveyed the addition, and that the parts thereof are accurately staked off and marked with an appropriate metal monument including magnetic iron, inscribed at least with the registration number of the land surveyor to provide source identification, at all lot corners and survey control points of the addition.

When the map or plat is made out, acknowledged, certified and approved by the governing body, it shall be filed and recorded in the office of the county clerk. When filed it is equivalent to a deed in fee simple to the city or town from the owner, of all streets, avenues, alleys, public squares, parks and commons and of that portion of the land set apart for public and city use, or dedicated to charitable, religious or educational purposes. All additions thus laid out are a part of the city or town for all purposes, and the inhabitants of the addition are entitled to all the rights and privileges and subject to all the laws, ordinances, rules and regulations of the city or town.

The governing body, by ordinance, may compel the owner of any addition to lay out streets, avenues and alleys to correspond in width and direction and be continuations of the streets, ways and alleys in the city or town or other additions thereto. No addition is valid unless the terms and conditions of the ordinance are complied with and the plat submitted and approved by the governing body.

With respect to any water rights appurtenant to lands to be subdivided in accordance with this section and prior to certification and approval of the map or plat the governing body shall require the owner to submit to the governing body the following:

The intended disposition of the water rights, by:

Written documentation from the state engineer or the state board of control that the owner submitted to the state engineer or the state board of control all documents necessary to voluntarily abandon the water rights, cancel any unadjudicated permits or eliminate applicable lands from any unadjudicated permits. The owner shall notify any purchasers of this action;

Written documentation from the state board of control that the owner submitted to the state board of control all documents necessary to change the use or place of use to provide for beneficial use of the water rights outside the subdivision, which may include a transfer to the city or town for use within its municipal water service boundaries;

A plan, accompanied by written documentation from the state engineer approving the plan, for the distribution of the water rights appurtenant to the land to be subdivided. The plan shall specify the distribution of the water to the lots within the subdivision and shall include written documentation from the state board of control that the owner submitted to the state board of control all documents necessary to change the use, place of use or point of diversion or means of conveyance in accordance with W.S.

41-3-103

,

41-3-104

or

41-3-114

; or

Written documentation from the state board of control that it has accepted an authorization to detach water rights appurtenant to the lands to be subdivided in accordance with rules and regulations promulgated by the state board of control.

If the subdivision is located within lands served by or crossed by a ditch, irrigation works or other water conveyance system, evidence that the owner submitted the subdivision map or plat to the public entity, company, association or appropriators responsible for the ditch, irrigations works or other water conveyance system for review and recommendations at least sixty (60) days prior to the submittal of the map or plat to the governing body. Upon receipt of the subdivision map or plat, the public entity, company, association or appropriators shall notify the owner if and how the subdivision will create a significant additional burden or risk of liability;

Evidence that the owner will specifically state on all offers and solicitations relative to the subdivision the owner’s intent to comply with this paragraph and that the owner does not warrant to a purchaser that the purchaser shall have any rights to the natural flow of any stream within or adjacent to the proposed subdivision. The owner shall further state that Wyoming law does not recognize any riparian rights to the continued natural flow of a stream or river for persons living on the banks of the stream or river;

If the subdivision is located within the boundaries of an irrigation district that is subject to the provisions of title 41, chapter 7 of the Wyoming statutes, the map or plat shall be accompanied by recommendations from the irrigation district regarding any changes to the attached water rights and the irrigation district’s easements. If there is a conflict with the irrigation district’s recommendations, the owner shall certify that it met with and made a good faith effort to resolve any conflicts with the irrigation district; and

If the subdivision will create a significant additional burden or risk of liability to the public entity, company, association or appropriators responsible for the ditch, irrigation works or other water conveyance system, the owner shall provide an adequate and responsible plan to reduce or eliminate the additional burden or risk of liability and evidence that the owner submitted the plan to the public entity, company, association or appropriators for review and recommendation regarding the adequacy of the plan.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 69; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-69; W.S. 1977, § 15-1-516; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 1987, ch. 2, § 1; 2022 ch. 107, § 1, effective March 22, 2022.

Cross references. —

As to acknowledgment of conveyances, see §

34-1-113

.

The 2022 amendment

added (e).

Laws 2022, ch. 107, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 22, 2022.

Editor’s notes. —

Laws 2022, ch. 107, § 2, provides, “The requirements in this act shall apply to subdivision applications filed on and after July 1, 2022.”

Approval by governing body of city becomes statutory prerequisite

to the validity of dedication. Prudential Trust Co. v. Laramie, 492 P.2d 971,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 217

(Wyo. 1972).

City may set reasonable requirements for approval of plat. —

The right and duty of the city to approve a plat necessarily carries with it the right to set reasonable and just prerequisites and requirements for approval of the plat, and in particular in the area of bringing the plat into conformity with other areas with respect to lots, blocks, streets and the like. Prudential Trust Co. v. Laramie, 492 P.2d 971,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 217

(Wyo. 1972).

City does not obtain title in fee simple by dedication. —

While the acknowledgment and recording by a city of dedication is equivalent to a deed in fee simple, it is not a deed in fee simple, and does not give the public the same right to sell or dispose of the same that a private party has to land for which he holds the title to fee simple. Payne v. Laramie, 398 P.2d 557,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 121

(Wyo. 1965).

And cannot reconvey dedicated property for some other use. —

It could not be contended that, if a private owner dedicates a street or a block in a city to public use, the public could convey it to a private party and have the property placed to some other use or purpose than that for which it was originally dedicated. Payne v. Laramie, 398 P.2d 557,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 121

(Wyo. 1965).

“Arbitrary and capricious” standard applicable under section. —

The general rule that administrative officers and boards will not be permitted to act in an arbitrary or capricious manner, and that courts will restrain such action, applies to such actions as those of a city council when it deals with the platting of land. Prudential Trust Co. v. Laramie, 492 P.2d 971,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 217

(Wyo. 1972).

Quoted

in

Ahearn v. Town of Wheatland, 2002 WY 12, 39 P.3d 409,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 2002).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Enforceability, by landowner, of subdivision developer's oral promise to construct or improve roads, 41 ALR4th 573.

§ 15-1-416.
Landowner petition to exclude tract from city or town; disposition thereof; exclusion of land for highway purposes.

and (b) Repealed by Laws 1997, ch. 158, § 3.

The governing body may exclude from any city or town land sufficient for the construction of state highways. Notice of the intended action and the time and place of public hearing for objections shall be published once each week for four (4) consecutive weeks prior to the hearing in a newspaper of general circulation within the city or town. No action may be taken by the governing body to exclude land for highway purposes over the objection of any owner of property to be excluded.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 70; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-70; W.S. 1977, § 15-1-517; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 1997, ch. 158, § 3.

§ 15-1-417.
Annexing contiguous cities or towns; procedure.

When any city or town desires to be annexed to another contiguous city or town, their governing bodies shall meet to determine the terms and conditions on which the proposed annexation might be made. If the governing body of each city or town approves of the terms and conditions proposed, the governing body of the city or town to be annexed shall circulate a written petition requesting annexation subject to the terms and conditions set forth in W.S.

15-1-403

among the city’s or town’s qualified registered electors. Once the petition is signed by at least a majority of the qualified registered electors residing in the city or town, as determined by the records of the county clerk, it shall be filed with the clerk of the annexing city or town.

No signature on the petition is valid if it is dated more than one hundred eighty (180) days prior to the date of filing the petition for annexation with the clerk. No person signing a petition for annexation may withdraw his signature from the petition after it has been filed with the clerk.

The clerk shall refer the petition to the governing body which shall then, without undue delay, take appropriate steps to comply with W.S.

15-1-402

,

15-1-404

and

15-1-405

and determine if the petition is in compliance with subsection (a) of this section.

If the petition is not in minimum compliance, the governing body of the city or town desiring to be annexed shall be notified that no further action will be taken on the petition until compliance is made.

As an alternative to the circulation of the petition as provided by subsection (a) of this section the town to be annexed may hold a special election on the question in accordance with W.S.

22-23-801

through

22-23-809

.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 143, § 1; W.S. 1977; § 15-1-518; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 1997, ch. 158, § 2.

§ 15-1-418.
Annexing contiguous cities or towns; annexation ordinance; filing.

If after the hearing, the governing body of the annexing city or town finds that the conditions and procedures required by W.S.

15-1-402

,

15-1-404

and

15-1-405

have been met and the terms and conditions in the written petition exist, it may by ordinance annex the city or town.

A certified copy of the annexation ordinance including a legal description of the area and the map prepared pursuant to W.S. 15-1-402(c)(i) and in accordance with W.S.

33-29-801

shall be filed with the county clerk of the county in which the action has taken place.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 143, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 15-1-519; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 1987, ch. 2, § 1; 1997, ch. 158, § 2; 2013 ch. 11, § 2, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, substituted “W.S.

33-29-801

” for “W.S. 33-29-139” in (b).

§ 15-1-419.
Annexing contiguous cities or towns; effective dates; appeals.

The annexation of any city or town is effective upon the publication date of the annexing city or town’s annexation ordinance, unless a different date is specified in the ordinance. Thereafter the city or town to which the annexation is made shall pass ordinances, not inconsistent with law, as will carry into effect the terms and conditions of the annexation. For purposes of taxation, the annexation does not become effective until January 1 next following the effective date of the ordinance, unless an appeal is filed and perfected, in which case the effective date is January 1 next following the court’s final decision.

Appeals to the district court and limitations thereon are governed by W.S.

15-1-409

except that any registered and qualified elector as of the date of adoption of the ordinance shall also be able to appeal to the district court.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 143, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 15-1-520; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 1997, ch. 158, § 2.

§ 15-1-420.
Annexing contiguous cities or towns; how governed; extension of laws, rights and utilities; dissolution of annexed city or town; disposition of assets and liabilities.

After the effective date of annexation, the city or town annexed shall be governed as part of the city or town to which it is annexed. The territory and inhabitants of the city or town annexed are subject to all the laws, ordinances, rules and regulations of the city or town to which annexed and are entitled to all the rights, privileges and franchise services afforded the inhabitants thereof including fire protection, sanitary facilities and utility service. If the inhabitants of the annexing city or town are furnished any utility service by the annexing city or town or under franchise, the annexed area may receive the same service.

The annexed city’s or town’s municipal corporate assets including money, real and personal property, and rights, titles and interests of any nature, upon the effective date of annexation, without further conveyance, are the assets of the annexing city or town. The annexed city or town, without further action, shall be dissolved and the annexation ordinance shall so provide. The annexing city or town shall make provision for meeting all liabilities of the annexed city or town through assumption or by other lawful means. No such assumption or other action taken under this act shall materially impair existing obligations of contract of either the annexing or annexed city or town. Liabilities to be assumed by the annexing city or town shall include all revenue bonds and other special obligations which by their terms are not payable from ad valorem taxes. The revenue bonds and special obligations shall not become general obligations of the annexing city or town.

The annexing city or town in the annexation ordinance shall allocate equitably the debts of the annexed and annexing city or town. The equitable allocation shall be according to benefits received by the annexed and annexing city or town from additional assets being brought into the combined city or town.

Any such bonded indebtedness may be refunded by the annexing city or town under the laws of Wyoming existing at the time of this refunding.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 143, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 15-1-521; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 15-1-101(a)(xv).

§ 15-1-421.
Municipal de-annexation.

Any landowner within a city or town may petition the governing body of the city or town to have his land or a portion of it de-annexed and the boundaries of the city or town redrawn so their land is outside the city or town boundaries. The landowner shall file the petition with the clerk of the affected city or town and shall also provide a copy of the petition to the county commissioners of the affected county. The county commissioners shall, within sixty (60) days, prepare a report on the impact of the de-annexation. The affected city or town may not take any action on the petition for de-annexation until after the sixty (60) day period. The commissioners may establish rules and regulations for the area to be de-annexed which are consistent with county land use plans and zoning ordinances.

The petitioner shall be responsible for publishing a public notice of the petition in a newspaper of general circulation in the affected municipality no more than ten (10) days after filing the petition with the municipal clerk. The notice shall also include a map showing identifiable landmarks and boundaries.

The governing body of the city or town may by ordinance provide for this de-annexation and redrawing of boundaries provided that:

The owners of all the land to be de-annexed either sign the petition for de-annexation or consent to the de-annexation within one hundred twenty (120) days after the final passage of the de-annexation ordinance and before its effective date. The passage of the ordinance shall serve as the consent of the city or town for any land owned by the city or town within the area to be de-annexed;

The ordinance is adopted within one hundred twenty (120) days after the receipt of the de-annexation petition and within one hundred eighty (180) days after the landowner’s signature of the petition, unless a further consent of all the landowners is obtained before the effective date of the ordinance; and

If the de-annexation causes land within the city or town boundaries to no longer be contiguous with the rest of the city or town, the de-annexation ordinance may be adopted only with the consent of all the owners of the land to be isolated by the de-annexation.

If the city or town owns any rights-of-way, easements, streets or other property or improvements within the area to be de-annexed it may:

Vacate or abandon them;

Transfer them to the county government with the consent of the county commissioners;

Agree to transfer them to another city or town upon completion of the annexation of all or part of the de-annexed land to that other city or town;

Retain ownership of them.

No de-annexation shall create an area which is situated entirely within the municipality but is not a part of the municipality.

The landowner petitioning to have land de-annexed and his successors and assigns shall remain liable for any assessments incurred or levied while the land was within the city or town boundaries and for all mill levies necessary to repay any indebtedness that was outstanding at any time the property was within the city or town boundaries. Neither the de-annexation nor subsequent annexation to or incorporation as another city shall increase or decrease these liabilities.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 79, § 1; 1997, ch. 158, § 2.

Cited

in

Gose v. City of Douglas, 2008 WY 126, 193 P.3d 1159,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 129

(Oct. 13, 2008).

§ 15-1-422.
Prohibited acts.

The granting of an exception to the area wide waste treatment management plan by any city or town to any person may not be conditioned upon any agreement by that person to annexation under this article.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 158, § 1.

§ 15-1-423.
Municipal growth management agreements.

Following a public hearing which may be held jointly between the affected cities or towns, any city or town may mutually agree with one (1) or more cities or towns defining the future geographical growth and expansion areas for each respective city or town. Any agreement under this section shall be reduced to writing and approved by the governing body of each city or town which is a party to the agreement. No agreement under this section shall be amended, terminated or voided by any party thereto after its execution except by the mutual written agreement of the parties to the agreement.

Any agreement entered into by and between any cities or towns under this section shall provide that the parties to the agreement shall not annex real property located in any other party’s defined growth and expansion area unless the nonannexing city or town’s governing body consents, in writing, to any such annexation.

Any agreement entered into by and between any cities or towns defining their respective future geographical growth and expansion areas prior to July 1, 2007 is hereby ratified and approved and may only be amended, terminated or voided by the mutual written agreement of the governing bodies of the parties thereto.

Nothing in this section shall supercede other requirements for annexation under this article.

History.

Laws 2007, ch. 83, § 1.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2007, ch. 83, § 2, makes the act effective July 1, 2007.